foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C4.lexc
LEXICON VtholaiInf


%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^வேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^வோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^வாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^வீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^வீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^வான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^வாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sge%=அர்:^வர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ந்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^விந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விகிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விகிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விகிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விகிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விகிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விகிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விகிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^விகிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+attitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகின்றன் #;

LEXICON ClassTholai4
விழித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
விதிர்த்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
விகரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
விசைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வருத்தித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வணைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வெடித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வலுத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வீதித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
திரஸ்கரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தழைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
துவைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
துகைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தரங்கித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தாக்கணித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தொந்தித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தப்பித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தேய்த்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ருசித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மழைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
முகைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மரத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மொசித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மறைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கிழித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கவித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
குமிழ்த்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
குடித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கம்பலைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கபளீத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கடுகுடுத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கோடித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பிரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பிரகரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பிடித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
புரோக்கித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பதைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பருத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பானித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பொரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பனித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பேதலித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பூசித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நிருமித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நிறைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நுணித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நமத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நொசித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நேதித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சிளுசிளுத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சிந்துரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சிறைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சயனித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சும்பித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சரைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சமாளித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
செழித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
செந்தளித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சந்தோஷித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சேதித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சங்கித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சீத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஒருக்கணித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஓர்த்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
எந்திரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
இரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
இலயித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஆவித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஆக்ஞாபித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
உளைத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
உதகரித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
உபவசித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
உற்பவித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அவ்வித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அருவருத்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அபிமானித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அனுட்டித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அசித்துத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சுமந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
தணந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
நிரந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
இறுமாந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
விண்டுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நீண்டுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வென்றுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தழன்றுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சொன்றுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கிளைந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
குமிழ்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
கனைந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
மலாய்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
முதிர்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
திகைந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
துலைந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
தடிந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
தவிர்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
சுழிந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
விசாய்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
வதிந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
பிகிந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
பறைந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
பொழிந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஞெகிழ்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஒழிந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
உலா்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
நிகழ்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
நைந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
நோய்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
இவா்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
அதிர்ந்துதொலை	VtholaiInf;
குற்றித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
குணகித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
குனுகித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கிளத்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கருடித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
கோணித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வக்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
விரசித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
வணக்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
புறாண்டித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பகா்த்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பிந்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பதுங்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
பொருவித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
முணவித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மயங்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மலங்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
மூஞ்சித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சிறாம்பித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
சீண்டித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
செருகித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
துப்பித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
துன்றித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
திணறித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தாளித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
தோற்றித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நுணுங்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நிகழ்த்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நீட்டித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நத்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
நொழுந்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஒத்தித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
எற்றித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
உறண்டித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
உருக்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
இறாட்டித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
இழிச்சித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அமுலாக்கித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அணாவித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
அராவித்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
இட்டுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
ஈன்றுத்தொலை	VtholaiInf;
